District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

47-2028

Additional penalties for failure to comply with chapter.

Repealed.

History

May 27, 1949, 63 Stat. 123, ch. 146, title I, § 148
Apr. 19, 1977, D.C. Law 1-124, title VI, § 601, 23 DCR 8749
July 24, 1982, D.C. Law 4-131, § 215, 29 DCR 2418
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
Oct. 4, 2000, D.C. Law 13-204, § 2(c), 47 DCR 5799

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-2028.
1973 Ed., § 47-2625.